California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) If the environmental impact report will be prepared under contract to the lead agency pursuant to Section 21082.1, the lead agency shall issue a request for proposals for preparation of the environmental impact report as soon as it has enough information to prepare a request for proposals, and in any event, not later than 30 days after the time for response to the notice of preparation has expired. The contract shall be awarded within 30 days of the response date for the request for proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.4.

(a) This article shall apply to all of the following agencies:

(1) The State Air Resources Board.

(2) A district as defined in Section 39025 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The State Water Resources Control Board.

(4) A California regional water quality control board.

(5) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(6) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(b) This article shall apply to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission and the California Public Utilities Commission for rules and regulations requiring the installation of pollution control equipment adopted
 pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 195, Sec. 4.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Public Assistance Program [21159.9. - 21159.9.]

21159.9.

The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation shall implement a public assistance and information program to ensure efficient and effective implementation of this division and to do both of the following:

(a) Establish a public education and training program for planners, developers, and other interested parties to assist them in implementing this division.

(b) (1) (A) Establish and maintain a database for the collection, storage, retrieval, and dissemination of environmental documents, notices of exemption, notices of preparation, notices of determination, and notices of completion
 provided to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation. The database shall be available online to the public through the internet. The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may coordinate with another state agency to host and maintain the online database.

(B) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may phase in the submission of electronic documents and use of the database by state and local public agencies.

(C) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may include additional information in the database, including, but not limited to, information related to planning, permitting, grants, and procurement, for the purposes of facilitating efficient and informed decisionmaking by public agencies and members of the public.

(2) (A) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation may charge a fee upon the submission of electronic documents pursuant to this division to the database for the reasonable costs incurred in implementing this subdivision.

(B) (i) The State Clearinghouse Administrative Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to be administered by the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation.

(ii) The fees received pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be deposited into the fund and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation for purposes of implementing this subdivision.

(C) A fee charged pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall be adopted in accordance with a formal rulemaking process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 35.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Special Review of Housing Projects [21159.20. - 21159.28.]

21159.20.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Census-defined place” means a specific unincorporated land area within boundaries determined by the United States Census Bureau in the most recent decennial census.

(b) “Community-level environmental review” means either of the following:

(1) An environmental impact report certified on any of the following:

(A) A general plan.

(B) A revision or update to the general plan that includes at least the land use and circulation elements.

(C) An applicable community plan.

(D) An applicable specific plan.

(E) A housing element of the general plan, if the environmental impact report analyzed the environmental effects of the density of the proposed project.

(2) Pursuant to this division and the implementing guidelines adopted pursuant to this division that govern subsequent review following a program environmental impact report, or pursuant to Section 21157.1, 21157.5, or 21166, a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration was adopted as a subsequent environmental review document, following and based upon an environmental impact report on any of the projects listed in subparagraphs (A), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1).

(c) “Low-income households” means households of persons and families of very low and low income, as defined in Sections 50093 and 50105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Low- and moderate-income households” means households of persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.21.

A housing project qualifies for an exemption from this division pursuant to Section 21159.22, 21159.23, or 21159.24 if it meets the criteria in the applicable section and all of the following criteria:

(a) The project is consistent with any applicable general plan, specific plan, and local coastal program, including any mitigation measures required by a plan or program, as that plan or program existed on the date that the application was deemed complete and with any applicable zoning ordinance, as that zoning ordinance existed on the date that the application was deemed complete, except that a project shall not be deemed to be inconsistent with the zoning designation for the site if that zoning
 designation is inconsistent with the general plan only because the project site has not been rezoned to conform with a more recently adopted general plan.

(b) Community-level environmental review has been adopted or certified.

(c) The project and other projects approved prior to the approval of the project can be adequately served by existing utilities, and the project applicant has paid, or has committed to pay, all applicable in-lieu or development fees.

(d) The site of the project does not contain wetlands, does not have any value as a wildlife habitat, and the project does not harm any species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or by the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), the California
 Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), and the project does not cause the destruction or removal of any species protected by a local ordinance in effect at the time the application for the project was deemed complete. For the purposes of this subdivision, “wetlands” has the same meaning as in Section 328.3 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations and “wildlife habitat” means the ecological communities upon which wild animals, birds, plants, fish, amphibians, and invertebrates depend for their conservation and protection.

(e) The site of the project is not included on any list of facilities and sites compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(f) The site of the project is subject to a preliminary endangerment assessment prepared by an environmental assessor to determine the existence of
 any release of a hazardous substance on the site and to determine the potential for exposure of future occupants to significant health hazards from any nearby property or activity.

(1) If a release of a hazardous substance is found to exist on the site, the release shall be removed, or any significant effects of the release shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with state and federal requirements.

(2) If a potential for exposure to significant hazards from surrounding properties or activities is found to exist, the effects of the potential exposure shall be mitigated to a level of insignificance in compliance with state and federal requirements.

(g) The project does not have a significant effect on historical resources pursuant to Section 21084.1.

(h) The project site is not subject to any of the following:

(1) A wildland fire hazard, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, unless the applicable general plan or zoning ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of a wildland fire hazard.

(2) An unusually high risk of fire or explosion from materials stored or used on nearby properties.

(3) Risk of a public health exposure at a level that would exceed the standards established by any state or federal agency.

(4) Within a delineated earthquake fault zone, as determined pursuant to Section 2622, or a seismic hazard zone, as determined pursuant to Section 2696, unless the applicable general plan or zoning
 ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of an earthquake fault or seismic hazard zone.

(5) Landslide hazard, flood plain, flood way, or restriction zone, unless the applicable general plan or zoning ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of a landslide or flood.

(i) (1) The project site is not located on developed open space.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “developed open space” means land that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is publicly owned, or financed in whole or in part by public funds.

(B) Is generally open to, and available for use by, the public.

(C) Is
 predominantly lacking in structural development other than structures associated with open spaces, including, but not limited to, playgrounds, swimming pools, ballfields, enclosed child play areas, and picnic facilities.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “developed open space” includes land that has been designated for acquisition by a public agency for developed open space, but does not include lands acquired by public funds dedicated to the acquisition of land for housing purposes.

(j) The project site is not located within the boundaries of a state conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 96.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.22.

(a) This division does not apply to any development project that meets the requirements of subdivision (b), and meets either of the following criteria:

(1) Consists of the construction, conversion, or use of residential housing for agricultural employees, and meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is affordable to lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Lacks public financial assistance.

(C) The developer of the development project provides sufficient legal commitments to the appropriate local agency to ensure the continued availability and use of the housing units for lower income households for a period of at least 15 years.

(2) Consists of the construction, conversion, or use of residential housing for agricultural employees and meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is housing for very low, low-, or moderate-income households as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(B) Public financial assistance exists for the development project.

(C) The developer of the development project provides sufficient legal commitments to the appropriate local agency to ensure the continued availability and use of the housing units for low- and moderate-income households for a period of at least 15 years.

(b) (1) If the development project is proposed within incorporated city limits or within a census defined place with a minimum population density of at least 5,000 persons per square mile, it is located on a project site that is adjacent, on at least two sides, to land that has been developed, and consists of not more than 45 units, or is housing for a total of 45 or fewer agricultural employees if the housing consists of dormitories, barracks, or other group living facilities.

(2) If the development project is located on a project site zoned for general agricultural use, and consists of not more than 20 units, or is housing for a total of 20 or fewer agricultural employees if the housing consists of dormitories, barracks, or other group living facilities.

(3) The project satisfies the criteria in Section 21159.21.

(4) The development project is not more than five acres in area, except that a project site located in an area with a population density of at least 1,000 persons per square mile shall not be more than two acres in area.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a project satisfies the criteria described in subdivisions (a) and (b), but does not satisfy the criteria described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this division does not apply to the project if the project meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Is located within either an incorporated city or a census-defined place.

(2) The population density of the incorporated city or census-defined place has a population density of at least 1,000 persons per square mile.

(3) The project site is adjacent on at least two sides to land that has been developed and the project consists of not more than 45 units, or the project consist of dormitories, barracks, or other group housing facilities for a total of 45 or fewer agricultural employees.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), this division shall apply to a project that meets the criteria described in subdivision (c) if a public agency that is carrying out or approving the project determines that there is a reasonable possibility that the project, if completed, would have a significant effect on the environment due to unusual circumstances or that the cumulative impacts of successive projects of the same type in the same area, over time, would be significant. 

For the purposes of this section, “agricultural employee” has the same meaning as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.23.

(a) This division does not apply to any development project that consists of the construction, conversion, or use of residential housing consisting of 100 or fewer that is affordable to low-income households if both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The developer of the development project provides sufficient legal commitments to the appropriate local agency to ensure the continued availability and use of the housing units for lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for a period of at least 30 years, at monthly housing costs, as determined pursuant to Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The development project meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The project satisfies the criteria described in Section 21159.21.

(B) The project site meets one of the following conditions:

(i) Has been previously developed for qualified urban uses.

(ii) The parcels immediately adjacent to the site are developed with qualified urban uses, or at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses and the remaining 25 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that have previously been developed for qualified urban uses, and the site has not been developed for urban uses and no parcel within the site has been created within 10 years prior to the proposed development of the site.

(C) The project site is not more than five acres in area.

(D) The project site is located within an urbanized areaor within a census-defined place with a population density of at least 5,000 persons per square mile or, if the project consists of 50 or fewer units, within an incorporated city with a population density of at least 2,500 persons per square mile and a total population of at least 25,000 persons.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a project satisfies all of the criteria described in subdivision (a) except subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of that subdivision, this division does not apply to the project if the project is located within either an incorporated city or a census defined place with a population density of at least 1,000 persons per square mile.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), this division applies to a project that meets the criteria of subdivision (b), if there is a reasonable possibility that the project would have a significant effect on the environment or the residents of the project due to unusual circumstances or due to the related or cumulative impacts of reasonably foreseeable projects in the vicinity of the project.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “residential” means a use consisting of either of the following:

(1) Residential units only.

(2) Residential units and primarily neighborhood-serving goods, services, or retail uses that do not exceed 15 percent of the total floor area of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.24.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this division does not apply to a project if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The project is a residential project on an infill site.

(2) The project is located within an urbanized area.

(3) The project satisfies the criteria of Section 21159.21.

(4) Within five years of the date that the application for the project is deemed complete pursuant to Section 65943 of the Government Code, community-level environmental review was certified or adopted.

(5) The site of the project is not more than four acres in total area.

(6) The project does not contain more than 100 residential units.

(7) Either of the following criteria are met:

(A) (i) At least 10 percent of the housing is sold to families of moderate income, or not less than 10 percent of the housing is rented to families of low income, or not less than 5 percent of the housing is rented to families of very low income.

(ii) The project developer provides sufficient legal commitments to the appropriate local agency to ensure the continued availability and use of the housing units for very low, low-, and moderate-income households at monthly housing costs determined
 pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(B) The project developer has paid or will pay in-lieu fees pursuant to a local ordinance in an amount sufficient to result in the development of an equivalent number of units that would otherwise be required pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(8) The project is within one-half mile of a major transit stop.

(9) The project does not include any single level building that exceeds 100,000 square feet.

(10) The project promotes higher density infill housing. A project with a density of at least 20 units per acre shall be conclusively presumed to promote higher density infill housing. A project with a density of at least 10 units per acre and a density greater than the average
 density of the residential properties within 1,500 feet shall be presumed to promote higher density housing unless the preponderance of the evidence demonstrates otherwise.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this division shall apply to a development project that meets the criteria described in subdivision (a), if any of the following occur:

(1) There is a reasonable possibility that the project will have a project-specific, significant effect on the environment due to unusual circumstances.

(2) Substantial changes with respect to the circumstances under which the project is being undertaken that are related to the project have occurred since community-level environmental review was certified or adopted.

(3) New information becomes available regarding
 the circumstances under which the project is being undertaken and that is related to the project, that was not known, and could not have been known, at the time that community-level environmental review was certified or adopted.

(c) If a project satisfies the criteria described in subdivision (a), but is not exempt from this division as a result of satisfying the criteria described in subdivision (b), the analysis of the environmental effects of the project in the environmental impact report or the negative declaration shall be limited to an analysis of the project-specific effect of the projects and any effects identified pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) For the purposes of this section, “residential” means a use consisting of either of the following:

(1) Residential units only.

(2) Residential units and primarily neighborhood-serving goods, services, or retail uses that do not exceed 25 percent of the total building square footage of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   (SB 674)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.25.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Residential or mixed-use housing project” means a project consisting of multifamily residential uses only or a mix of multifamily residential and nonresidential uses, with at least two-thirds of the square footage of the development designated for residential use.

(2) “Substantially surrounded” means at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the project site adjoins, or is separated only by an improved public right-of-way from, parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses. The remainder of the perimeter of the site adjoins, or is separated only
 by an improved public right-of-way from, parcels that have been designated for qualified urban uses in a zoning, community plan, or general plan for which an environmental impact report was certified.

(b) Without limiting any other statutory exemption or categorical exemption, this division does not apply to a residential or mixed-use housing project if all of the following conditions described in this section are met:

(1) The project is consistent with the applicable general plan designation and all applicable general plan policies as well as with applicable zoning designation and regulations.

(2) (A) The public agency approving or carrying out the project determines, based upon substantial
 evidence, that the density of the residential portion of the project is not less than the greater of the following:

(i) The average density of the residential properties that adjoin, or are separated only by an improved public right-of-way from, the perimeter of the project site, if any.

(ii) The average density of the residential properties within 1,500 feet of the project site.

(iii) Six dwelling units per acre.

(B) The residential portion of the project is a multifamily housing development that contains six or more residential units.

(3) The proposed development occurs within an unincorporated area
 of a county on a project site of no more than five acres substantially surrounded by qualified urban uses.

(4) The project site has no value as habitat for endangered, rare, or threatened species.

(5) Approval of the project would not result in any significant effects relating to transportation, noise, air quality, greenhouse gas emissions, or water quality.

(6) The site can be adequately served by all required utilities and public services.

(7) The project is located on a site that is a legal parcel or parcels wholly within the boundaries of an urbanized area or urban cluster, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to a residential or mixed-use housing project if any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The cumulative impact of successive projects of the same type in the same place over time is significant.

(2) There is a reasonable possibility that the project will have a significant effect on the environment due to unusual circumstances.

(3) The project may result in damage to scenic resources, including, but not limited to, trees, historic buildings, rock outcroppings, or similar resources, within a highway officially designated as a state scenic highway.

(4) The
 project is located on a site which is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(5) The project may cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of a historical resource.

(6) The project may cause a substantial adverse impact to tribal cultural resources, as defined in Section 21074.

(d) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section and it determines to approve or carry out the project, the lead agency shall file a notice with the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in the county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 271, Sec. 1.   (AB 2199)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.26.

With respect to a project that includes a housing development, a public agency may not reduce the proposed number of housing units as a mitigation measure or project alternative for a particular significant effect on the environment if it determines that there is another feasible specific mitigation measure or project alternative that would provide a comparable level of mitigation. This section does not affect any other requirement regarding the residential density of that project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.27.

A project may not be divided into smaller projects to qualify for one or more exemptions pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1039, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.28.

(a) If a residential or mixed-use residential project is consistent with the use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code has accepted the metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets and if the project incorporates the mitigation measures required by an applicable prior environmental document, then any findings or other determinations for an exemption, a negative declaration, a mitigated negative declaration, a sustainable communities environmental assessment, an environmental impact report, or addenda prepared or adopted for the project pursuant to this division shall not be required to reference, describe, or discuss (1) growth inducing impacts; or (2) any project specific or cumulative impacts from cars and light-duty truck trips generated by the project on global warming or the regional transportation network.

(b) Any environmental impact report prepared for a project described in subdivision (a) shall not be required to reference, describe, or discuss a reduced residential density alternative to address the effects of car and light-duty truck trips generated by the project.

(c) “Regional transportation network,” for purposes of this section, means all existing and proposed transportation system improvements, including the state transportation system, that were included in the transportation and air quality conformity modeling, including congestion modeling, for the final regional transportation plan adopted by the metropolitan planning organization, but shall not include local streets and roads. Nothing in the foregoing relieves any project from a requirement to comply with any conditions, exactions, or fees for the mitigation of the project’s impacts on the structure, safety, or operations of the regional transportation network or local streets and roads.

(d) A residential or mixed-use residential project is a project where at least 75 percent of the total building square footage of the project consists of residential use or a project that is a transit priority project as defined in Section 21155.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 728, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Program Environmental Impact Report for Clean Infrastructure Projects [21159.30. - 21159.33.]

21159.30.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the state to ensure that California’s environmental review processes are streamlined and optimized to ensure the most efficient process to approve clean infrastructure projects in a manner that does not weaken environmental protections or public participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 17.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.31.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(b) “Facility” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 25545, except for paragraph (4).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 17.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.32.

(a) The Energy Commission shall prepare a program environmental impact report to analyze the development of a class or classes of facility for which the Energy Commission has received an application under the certification program established by Chapter 6.2 (commencing with Section 25545) of Division 15.

(b) The program environmental impact report shall comply with all requirements of this division, and shall contain all of the following:

(1) A description of the class or classes of facility being analyzed.

(2) A description of potential project locations.

(3) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of the potential environmental impacts of developing the class or classes of facility identified in paragraph (1).

(4) A description of potentially feasible mitigation measures to avoid or minimize the impacts identified in paragraph (3).

(5) An identification of trustee and potential responsible agencies with regulatory authority over the class or classes of facility identified in paragraph (1).

(6) An analysis of cumulative impacts and project alternatives.

(c) The Energy Commission shall consult with the public agencies identified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) in conducting the analysis of environmental impacts and identification of potentially feasible mitigation measures and
 alternatives.

(d) The development of a class or classes of facility constitutes a program for the purposes of Section 21094.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 17.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.33.

A public agency considering approval of a specific facility that is within the class or classes of facility described in the program environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Section 21159.32 may tier from that program environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21094 only if the project meets the requirements of Sections 25545.3.3 and 25545.3.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 17.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Submission of Information [21160. - 21161.]

21160.

(a) Whenever any person applies to any public agency for a lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use, the public agency may require that person to submit data and information that may be necessary to enable the public agency to determine whether the proposed project may have a significant effect on the environment or to prepare an environmental impact report.

(b) If any or all of the information so submitted is a “trade secret” as defined in Section 7924.510 of the Government Code by those submitting that information, it shall not be included in the impact report or otherwise disclosed by any public agency. This
 section shall not be construed to prohibit the exchange of properly designated trade secrets between public agencies who have lawful jurisdiction over the preparation of the impact report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 380.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21161.

Whenever a public agency has completed an environmental document, it shall cause a notice of completion of that report to be filed with the Office of Planning and Research using the Office of Planning and Research’s online process. The public agency is not required to mail a printed copy of the notice of completion to the Office of Planning and Research. The notice of completion shall briefly identify the project and shall indicate that an environmental document has been prepared. The notice of completion shall identify the project location by latitude and longitude. Failure to file the notice required by this section shall not affect the validity of a project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 9.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. No Place Like Home Projects [21163. - 21163.4.]

21163.

For purposes of this chapter, “No Place Like Home project” means a permanent supportive housing project that meets the criteria for funding pursuant to the No Place Like Home Program (Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and for which a public agency applies for, or receives, funding from the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by Section 21163.4)
-------------------------------------------

21163.1.

A decision by a public agency to seek funding from, or the Department of Housing and Community Development’s awarding of funds pursuant to, the No Place Like Home Program (Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) does not constitute a “project” for purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by Section 21163.4)
-------------------------------------------

21163.2.

If a No Place Like Home project is not eligible for approval as a use by right pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 65650) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and is subject to this division, the development applicant may request, within 10 days after the lead agency determines the type of environmental documentation required for the project pursuant to this division, that the lead agency prepare and certify the record of proceeding for the environmental review of the No Place Like Home project in accordance with Section 21186.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by Section 21163.4)
-------------------------------------------

21163.3.

(a) (1) If a local agency approves or determines to carry out a No Place Like Home project that is subject to this division, the local agency shall file notice of that approval or determination in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 21152, except that the notice shall be filed within two working days after the approval or determination becomes final.

(2) If a local agency approves or determines to carry out a No Place Like Home project that is not subject to this division, the local agency shall file a notice of exemption in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 21152, except that the notice shall be filed within two working days after the approval or determination
 becomes final.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 21167, an action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the acts or decision of a public agency on the grounds of noncompliance with this division for a No Place Like Home project shall commence within 30 days from the date of the filing of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If the local agency fails to comply with the applicable timing requirements set forth in subdivision (a), an action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the acts or decision of a public agency on the grounds of noncompliance with this division for a No Place Like Home project shall commence within 30 days from the date of the local agency’s late filing of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) or 90 days from the date that the notice was required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (a), whichever is
 earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by Section 21163.4)
-------------------------------------------

21163.4.

(a) (1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall notify the Speaker of the Assembly and the President pro Tempore of the Senate when the funding provided pursuant to the No Place Like Home Program (Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) is fully allocated and disbursed. Notification from the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to this subdivision shall be printed in the journal of each of the respective houses of the Legislature.

(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall post a copy of the notification provided pursuant to this subdivision on its internet website.

(b) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1 of the year following notification from the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (a), and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 346, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5.5, commencing with Section 21163.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Limitations [21165. - 21177.]

21165.
